Hawaii statutes.
§147-34 Inspection; certification fees.
The board of agriculture may designate any employee or agent of the department
as an inspector to classify and inspect fresh and processed flowers and foliage
for quality and condition and to determine if containers, packing materials,
and methods of packing meet the minimum requirements established. In addition
the inspector may classify and inspect flowers and foliage for quality and
condition at the request of persons having a financial interest in the commodities
in order to ascertain and to certify to those persons the grade,
classification, quality, or condition thereof and other pertinent facts. The
department may fix, assess, and collect or cause to be collected fees for those
certification services when they are performed by the employees of the
department. The fees shall be on a uniform basis and in an amount reasonably
necessary to cover the cost of certification services provided at the request
of persons having a financial interest. Except for fees collected by the
department pursuant to part VII, all fees collected by the department pursuant
to this part shall be deposited with the state director of finance to the
credit of the general fund. [L 1959, c 267, pt of §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§§14, 22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1963, c 114, §1 and c 193, §10; Supp,
§22-26.5; HRS §147-34; am L 2003, c 49, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next